Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Information Confidentiality Officers

§ 25-53-51.
Qualifications for position.

To qualify for the position of information confidentiality officer a person must:

Be an employee of a state agency or institution in a position such that his duties require him to handle or process or supervise the handling or processing of data in conjunction with the use of automated information technology equipment for an agency or institution other than that for whom he is regularly employed.

Have been continuously employed for a period of at least one hundred eighty (180) days by such agency or institution or have successfully been cleared for employment through an investigation that shall consist of a determination as to good moral character and that the prospective employee has not been convicted of a felony. In order to determine the applicant’s suitability for employment at the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, the applicant shall be fingerprinted. If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Mississippi Department of Public Safety to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check. A prospective employee may be provisionally employed based on a reference check by the employing agency pending final receipt of the results of a national criminal history record check for a period not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days.

Successfully complete a suitable instructional course on the subjects of information security, privacy and confidentiality and protection, to be developed and taught under the supervision of the executive director. An employee may work in a provisional capacity under the direct supervision of an information confidentiality officer as part of an on-the-job training program while completing instructional requirements, for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days.

Be duly sworn to the following oath: “I,_______________ , do solemnly swear to protect and uphold the confidentiality of all information that may come to my knowledge that is designated as ‘confidential information’ by another state agency or institution for which I may handle or process in the normal course of my duties. I swear to exercise reasonable care in the handling and processing of all such designated data and further that I will not reveal or otherwise divulge information from such data obtained. I understand that proven violation of this oath will subject me to forfeiture of my bond and dismissal from employment.”

In order to maintain appropriate liability insurance necessary to cover damages for any nonmalicious act, the Department of Information Technology Services will work in conjunction with the Tort Claims Board.

In order to clear vendors, such as maintenance personnel, security personnel, cleaning personnel, contractors and other vendors with a valid need to gain access into the State Data Centers and campus, the department shall determine these individuals have not been convicted of a felony through a fingerprint-based criminal history background check. If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Department of Public Safety to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 372, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 410, § 3; Laws, 2016, ch. 403, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 25-53-53.
Handling and processing of information and data.

Information and data shall be considered public record information and data and receive normal handling and processing unless designated as “confidential information” by the agency and institution originating the data. Information and data designated as “confidential information” will receive special handling based on procedures agreed to by the executive director and the agency or institution head and shall be handled in accordance with the oath subscribed to by the confidentiality officer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 372, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§ 25-53-55.
Investigation of and hearing on complaints of allegedly improper disclosure of confidential information.

Upon written complaint of any person claiming to be adversely affected by disclosure of confidential information by any information confidentiality officer, the director shall give notice to the information confidentiality officer of the fact that such complaint has been filed and shall give such notice to the Chairman of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, who shall call a meeting of the members of the authority for the purpose of hearing such complaint. The authority shall then conduct an investigation into the matter and shall afford to the complaining party and the information confidentiality officer a hearing, of which reasonable notice shall be given. For purposes of such hearing, the authority, under signature of the secretary of the authority attested by the chairman, shall have the power to subpoena witnesses and documentary or other evidence. After such hearing, if the authority, based upon substantial evidence, shall find that the information confidentiality officer has disclosed confidential information in violation of his oath, the authority shall enter such finding of fact on its minutes and the information confidentiality officer shall be immediately discharged from employment. If the authority shall find that such oath has not been violated, it shall, likewise, enter such finding on its minutes and the complaint shall be dismissed. The finding of the authority shall be prima facie evidence of the truth thereof in any judicial procedure seeking forfeiture of the bond of such information confidentiality officer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 372, § 4; Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 25-53-57.
Officer as legal agent and employee of agency or institution for which he is processing data.

An information confidentiality officer shall be considered a legal agent of the agency or institution and for the purposes of Sections 25-53-51 through 25-53-59 shall be considered to be an employee of the agency or institution for which he may be processing data at that particular time.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 372, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§ 25-53-59.
Penalty for improper release or divulgence of confidential information.

Any information confidentiality officer who shall intentionally and wilfully violate his oath by releasing or divulging confidential information without proper authority shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and sentenced to not exceeding one (1) year in jail or a fine of not exceeding One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 372, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1976.